Washington statutes.
RCW 22.09.230

Rights and duties of warehouse licensees—Signs—Use of "Washington Bonded Warehouse."

Every warehouse licensee shall post at or near the main entrance to each of his or her warehouses a sign as prescribed by the department which shall include the words "Washington Bonded Warehouse." It is unlawful to display such sign or any sign of similar appearance or bearing the same words, or words of similar import, when the warehouse is not licensed and bonded under this chapter.

[ 2011 c 336 s 615; 1983 c 305 s 39; 1963 c 124 s 23.]

NOTES:

Severability—1983 c 305: See note following RCW 20.01.010.